Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.10.205

Amendment of bylaws—Election of directors.

(1) Unless the articles of incorporation specifically prohibit the adoption of a bylaw pursuant to this section or alter the vote specified in RCW 23B.07.280(4), or cumulative voting is authorized, a public company may elect in its bylaws to be governed in the election of directors as follows:

(a) Each vote entitled to be cast may be voted for, voted against, or withheld for one or more candidates up to that number of candidates that is equal to the number of directors to be elected but without cumulating the votes, or a shareholder may indicate an abstention for one or more candidates;

(b) To be elected, a candidate must have received the number, percentage, or level of votes specified in the bylaws; provided that holders of shares entitled to vote in the election and constituting a quorum are present at the meeting. Except in a contested election as provided in (e) of this subsection, a candidate who does not receive the number, percentage, or level of votes specified in the bylaws but who was a director at the time of the election shall continue to serve as a director for a term that shall terminate on the date that is the earlier of (i) the date specified in the bylaw, but not longer than ninety days from the date on which the voting results are determined pursuant to RCW 23B.07.035(2), or (ii) the date on which an individual is selected by the board of directors to fill the office held by such director, which selection shall be deemed to constitute the filling of a vacancy by the board to which RCW 23B.08.100 applies;

(c) A bylaw adopted pursuant to this section may provide that votes cast against and/or withheld as to a candidate are to be taken into account in determining whether the number, percentage, or level of votes required for election has been received. Unless the bylaw specifies otherwise, only votes cast are to be taken into account and a ballot marked "withheld" in respect to a share is deemed to be a vote cast. Unless the bylaws specify otherwise, shares otherwise present at the meeting but for which there is an abstention or as to which no authority or direction to vote in the election is given or specified, are not deemed to be votes cast in the election;

(d) The board of directors may select any qualified individual to fill the office held by a director who did not receive the specified vote for election referenced in (b) of this subsection; and

(e) Unless the bylaw specifies otherwise, a bylaw adopted pursuant to this subsection (1) shall not apply to an election of directors by a voting group if (i) at the expiration of the time fixed under a provision requiring advance notification of director candidates, or (ii) absent such a provision, at a time fixed by the board of directors which is not more than fourteen days before notice is given of the meeting at which the election is to occur, there are more candidates for election by the voting group than the number of directors to be elected, one or more of whom are properly proposed by shareholders. An individual shall not be considered a candidate for purposes of this subsection (1)(e) if the board of directors determines before the notice of meeting is given that such individual's candidacy does not create a bona fide election contest.

(2) A bylaw containing an election to be governed by this section may be repealed or amended:

(a) If originally adopted by the shareholders, only by the shareholders, unless the bylaw otherwise provides; or

(b) If adopted by the board of directors, by the board of directors or the shareholders.

[ 2019 c 141 s 4; 2009 c 189 s 36; 2007 c 467 s 5.]